New York, session 2025-2026, S1216.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 840 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. The council shall, in addition: 4 (a) Develop, maintain and disseminate, in consultation with the 5 commissioner of mental hygiene and the commissioner of the office of 6 addiction services and supports, written policies and procedures regard- 7 ing protocols for response to crisis situations involving persons with 8 mental illness and/or substance abuse disorder. Such policies and proce- 9 dures shall make provisions for the education and training of all new 10 and veteran police officers in any city having a population of one 11 million or more on the protocols for response to crisis situations 12 involving persons with mental illness and/or substance abuse disorder; 13 and 14 (b) Recommend to the governor, rules and regulations with respect to 15 the establishment and implementation on an ongoing basis of a training 16 program for all current and new police officers in any city having a 17 population of one million or more regarding the policies and procedures 18 established pursuant to this subdivision, along with recommendations for 19 periodic retraining of such officers. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 22 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 23 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 24 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03232-01-5